Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4230
Recovery of noncovered expenses; cause of action; subrogation.

The pool shall have a cause of action against a covered individual for the recovery of the amount of benefits paid which are not for covered expenses. Benefits due from the pool may be reduced or refused as a setoff against any amount recoverable under this section. The pool shall have a right of subrogation to any payments made to a covered individual by another person or his or her insurer on account of an injury caused by such other person's wrongful act or negligence.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 30;

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 109;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 31.